Utah statutes.
70A-2-514.   When documents deliverable on acceptance -- When on payment.
Unless otherwise agreed documents against which a draft is drawn are to be
delivered to the drawee on acceptance of the draft if it is payable more than
three days after presentment; otherwise, only on payment.
